Massachusetts, session 194th, H2631.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 131J of chapter 140, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by adding the following paragraph:- If a stun gun is discharged by a law enforcement or public
safety official, the data relative to the discharge, including time and duration of discharge, serial
number of the stun gun used and the identity of the official responsible for the discharge, shall be
reported within 24 hours to the commanding officer of the official and the attorney general. A
contractor whose business consists of collecting stun gun data for the commonwealth, upon
notice of discharge of a stun gun, shall report the time and duration of discharge and the serial
number of the stun gun used to the attorney general within 24 hours.
of 1